Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1213
Records; property of government; protected; willfully mutilate, destroy, transfer, remove, damage, or otherwise dispose of; violation; penalty.

All records made or received by or under the authority of, or coming into the custody, control, or possession of agencies in any of the three branches of the state government, or of any local political subdivision, in the course of their public duties, are the property of the government concerned, and shall not be mutilated, destroyed, transferred, removed, damaged, or otherwise disposed of, in whole or in part, except as provided by law.

Any person who shall willfully mutilate, destroy, transfer, remove, damage, or otherwise dispose of such records or any part of such records, except as provided by law, and any person who shall retain and continue to hold the possession of any such records, or parts thereof, belonging to the state government or to any local political subdivision, and shall refuse to deliver up such records, or parts thereof, to the proper official under whose authority such records belong, upon demand being made by such officer or, in cases of a defunct office, to the succeeding agency or to the State Archives of the Nebraska State Historical Society, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 13, p. 1392;

Laws 1973, LB 224, § 15;

Laws 1979, LB 559, § 7;

Laws 1980, LB 747, § 3.